California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 under paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (d). The department may make interim determinations and allocations of such SNCP funds, provided that the interim determinations and allocations take into account adjustments to reported expenditures for possible audit disallowances, consistent with the type of adjustments applied in prior projects years under Article 5.2 (commencing with Section 14166). Any interim determinations and allocations of redirected SNCP funds based on excess certified public expenditures shall be subject to interim and final reconciliations.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the receipt of a notice of disallowance or deferral from the federal government related to any certified public expenditures for uncompensated care incurred by DPHs that are used for federal claiming under the SNCP pursuant to California’s Bridge to Reform Section 1115(a) Demonstration after this section is implemented, and subject
 to the processes described in subdivisions (a) through (d) of Section 14166.24, the following shall apply with respect to the disallowance or deferral:

(1) The department and the DPH shall each be responsible for half of the repayment of the federal portion of any federal disallowance or deferral for the applicable demonstration year, up to the amount claimed and allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for that particular year.

(2) If there are additional disallowances or deferrals beyond those described in paragraph (1), the department shall be solely responsible for the repayment of the federal portion of any federal disallowance or deferral for the applicable demonstration year, up to the amount claimed and allocated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) for that particular year.

(3) If there
 are additional disallowances or deferrals beyond those described in paragraphs (1) and (2) for the applicable demonstration year, the DPH shall be solely responsible for the repayment of the federal portion of all remaining federal disallowances or deferrals for that particular year.

(h) The department shall obtain federal approvals or waivers as necessary to implement this section and to obtain federal financial participation to the maximum extent permitted by federal law. This section shall be implemented only to the extent other federal financial participation is not jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 120.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.8. HEALTH CARE REFORM ELIGIBILITY, ENROLLMENT, AND RETENTION PLANNING ACT [15925. - 15926.]

15925.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Health Care Reform Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention Planning Act.

(b) (1) The California Health and Human Services Agency, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services (department), Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board (MRMIB), the California Health Benefit Exchange (Exchange), the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, counties, health care service plans, consumer advocates, and other stakeholders shall undertake a planning and development process regarding this part and aspects of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (PPACA) (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and regulations or guidance issued pursuant to these acts, related to eligibility for, and enrollment and retention in, state health subsidy programs.

(2) The planning and development process shall provide stakeholders the opportunity to provide meaningful input into the planning and development of the aspects of eligibility, enrollment, and retention identified in this section. This process
 shall be completed in time for all of the following to occur:

(A) The certification and approval of the eligibility, enrollment, and retention system, as required by PPACA and regulations and guidance issued thereunder.

(B) The approval of enhanced federal funding for Medi-Cal eligibility system development, implementation, and maintenance.

(C) The readiness of the eligibility, enrollment, and retention processes to accept and process applications, as required by federal law.

(3) The planning and development process shall consider issues, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Whether to use the application developed by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services,
 pursuant to Section 1413 of the PPACA (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18083), or whether to develop a separate state form.

(B) What process to use for Medi-Cal eligibility determinations for non-Modified Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) populations, including whether to develop a supplemental application form and how the applications will be processed.

(C) Whether to adopt a process for hospitals to enroll infants deemed eligible for Medi-Cal under Section 1396a(e)(4) of Title 42 of the United States Code or the Healthy Families Program under Section 12693.70 of the Insurance Code immediately online, without an application.

(D) What data collection standards to utilize for the collection of race, ethnicity, primary language, and disability status.

(E) Whether to create a
 process to allow recipients to provide an update to eligibility information in between renewal dates and to have the option to renew eligibility at the time of the update, resetting the renewal date.

(F) Whether to renew eligibility for a state health subsidy program based on information from a public benefits program, if the recipient is otherwise eligible.

(G) Protections for the confidentiality of personal information.

(H) What process to use to enable applicants determined eligible for and recipients of a state health subsidy program to choose a health plan, if applicable.

(4) The agency shall provide the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature with information reflecting the process conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) by July 1,
 2012, regarding policy and statutory changes needed to develop and implement the eligibility, enrollment, and retention system for health coverage in compliance with this part.

(c) The information reporting requirement imposed under paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) is inoperative on January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 71.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15926.

(a) The following definitions apply for purposes of this part:

(1) “Accessible” means in compliance with Section 11135 of the Government Code, Section 1557 of the PPACA, and regulations or guidance adopted pursuant to these statutes.

(2) “Limited-English-proficient” means not speaking English as one’s primary language and having a limited ability to read, speak, write, or understand English.

(3) “Insurance affordability program” means a program that is one of the following:

(A) The Medi-Cal program under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et
 seq.).

(B) The state’s children’s health insurance program (CHIP) under Title XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et seq.).

(C) A program that makes available to qualified individuals coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code with advance payment of the premium tax credit established under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) A program that makes available coverage in a qualified health plan through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code with cost-sharing reductions established under Section 1402 of PPACA and any subsequent amendments to that act.

(b) An individual shall have the option to apply for insurance affordability programs in person, by mail, online, by telephone, or by other commonly available electronic
 means, including a mobile-friendly internet website.

(c) (1) A single, accessible, standardized paper, electronic, and telephone application for insurance affordability programs shall be developed by the department, in consultation with the board governing the Exchange, as part of the stakeholder process described in subdivision (b) of Section 15925. The application shall be used by all entities authorized to make an eligibility determination for any of the insurance affordability programs and by their agents.

(2) The department may develop and require the use of supplemental forms to collect additional information needed to determine eligibility on a basis other than the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal Patient Protection and
 Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments, as provided under Section 435.907(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and as amended by federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21).

(3) The
 application, or any amendments thereto, as required to comply with Public Law 119-21, shall be user-tested for accuracy and readability in all Medi-Cal threshold languages and shall be operational by the date as required by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services, including prior to the effective date of any applicable changes required pursuant to Public Law 119-21.

(4) The application form, or any amendments thereto,
 shall, to the extent consistent with federal statutes, regulations, and guidance, satisfy all of the following criteria:

(A) The form, or any supplements thereto, shall include simple, user-friendly language and instructions.

(B) The
 form, or any amendments and supplemental forms thereto, may not ask for information related to a nonapplicant that is not necessary to determine eligibility in the applicant’s particular circumstances.

(C) The form, or any amendments and supplemental forms thereto, may require only information necessary to support the eligibility and enrollment processes for insurance affordability programs.

(D) The
 form, or any amendments and supplemental forms thereto, may be used for, but shall not be limited to, screening and enrollment into an insurance affordability program.

(E) The form may ask, or be used otherwise to identify, if the mother of an infant applicant under one year of age had coverage through an insurance affordability program for the infant’s birth, for the purpose of automatically enrolling the infant into the applicable program without the family having to complete the application process for the infant.

(F) The form may include questions that are voluntary for applicants to answer regarding demographic data categories, including
 race, ethnicity, primary language, disability status, and other categories recognized by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services under Section 4302 of the PPACA.

(G) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (B) and (C), on or before January 1, 2027, the form shall include an optional question for an applicant to identify whether they are experiencing homelessness.

(H) The form may be used, to the extent possible, to determine compliance with work or community engagement requirements set forth in Section 1396a(xx) of Title 42 of the United States Code (Section 71119 of Public Law 119-21), as described in Section 14005.69, including any exemptions to those requirements, without seeking additional information.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of a provider-based application form or enrollment procedures for insurance affordability programs or other health programs that differs from the application form described in subdivision (c), and related enrollment procedures. Nothing in this section shall preclude the use of a joint application, developed by the department and the State Department of Social Services, that allows for an application to be made for multiple programs, including, but not limited to,
 CalWORKs, CalFresh, and insurance affordability programs.

(e) The entity making the eligibility determination shall grant eligibility immediately whenever possible and with the consent of the applicant in accordance with the state and federal rules governing insurance affordability programs.

(f) (1) If the eligibility, enrollment, and retention system has the ability to prepopulate an application form for insurance affordability programs with personal information from available electronic databases, an applicant shall be given the option, with their informed consent, to have the application form prepopulated. Before a prepopulated application is submitted to the entity authorized to make eligibility determinations, the individual shall be given the opportunity to provide additional eligibility information and to correct any information retrieved from a
 database.

(2) All insurance affordability programs may accept self-attestation, instead of requiring an individual to produce a document, for age, date of birth, family size, household income, state residence, pregnancy, work or community engagement activities or exemptions to those requirements, and any other applicable criteria needed to determine the eligibility of an applicant or recipient, to the extent permitted by state and federal law.

(3) An applicant or recipient shall have their information electronically verified in the manner required by the PPACA, Public Law 119-21,
 and implementing federal regulations and guidance and state law.

(4) Before an eligibility determination is made, the individual shall be given the opportunity to provide additional eligibility information and to correct information.

(5) The eligibility of an applicant shall not be delayed beyond the timeliness standards as provided in Section 435.912 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or denied for any insurance affordability program unless the applicant is given a reasonable opportunity, of at least the kind provided for under the Medi-Cal program pursuant to Section 14007.5 and paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 14011.2, to resolve discrepancies concerning any information provided by a verifying
 entity, including the opportunity to provide information to demonstrate compliance with work or community engagement requirements pursuant to Section 14005.69.

(6) To the extent federal financial participation is available, an applicant shall be provided benefits in accordance with the rules of the insurance affordability program, as implemented in federal regulations and guidance, for which the applicant otherwise qualifies until a determination is made that the applicant is not eligible and all applicable notices have been provided. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to grant presumptive eligibility if it is not otherwise required by state law, and, if so required, then only to the extent permitted by federal law.

(g) The eligibility, enrollment, and retention system shall offer an applicant and recipient assistance with their
 application or renewal for an insurance affordability program in person, over the telephone, by mail, online, or through other commonly available electronic means and in a manner that is accessible to individuals with disabilities and those who are limited English proficient.

(h) (1) During the processing of an application, renewal, or a transition due to a change in circumstances, an entity making eligibility determinations for an insurance affordability program shall ensure that an eligible applicant and recipient of insurance affordability programs that meets all program eligibility requirements and complies with all necessary requests for information moves between programs without any breaks in coverage and without being required to provide any forms, documents, or other information or undergo verification that is duplicative or otherwise unnecessary. The individual shall be informed about how to obtain information
 about the status of their application, renewal, or transfer to another program at any time, and the information shall be promptly provided when requested.

(2) The application or case of an individual screened as not eligible for Medi-Cal on the basis of Modified Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) household income or noncompliance with the requirements of Section 14005.69, but who may be eligible on the basis of being 65 years of age or older, or on the basis of blindness or disability, shall be forwarded to the Medi-Cal program for an eligibility determination. During the period this application or case is processed for a non-MAGI Medi-Cal eligibility determination, if the applicant or recipient is otherwise eligible for an insurance affordability program, the applicant or recipient shall be determined eligible for that program.

(3) Renewal procedures shall include all available methods for reporting renewal information, including, but not limited to, face-to-face, telephone, mail, and online renewal or renewal through other commonly available electronic means.

(4) An applicant who is not eligible for an insurance affordability program for a reason other than income eligibility, including work or community engagement requirements, or for any reason in the case of applicants and recipients residing in a county that offers a health coverage program for individuals with income above the maximum allowed for the Exchange premium tax credits, shall be
 provided application information and referred to the county health coverage program in their county of residence.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivisions (e), (f), and (j), before an online applicant who appears to be eligible for the Exchange with a premium tax credit or reduction in cost sharing, or both, may be enrolled in the Exchange, both of the following shall occur:

(1) The applicant shall be informed of the overpayment penalties under the federal Comprehensive 1099 Taxpayer Protection and Repayment of Exchange Subsidy Overpayments Act of 2011 (Public Law 112-9), if the individual’s annual family income increases by a specified amount or more, calculated on the basis of the individual’s current family size and current income, and that penalties are avoided by prompt reporting of income increases throughout the year.

(2) The applicant shall be informed of the penalty for failure to have minimum essential health coverage.

(j) The department shall, in coordination with the Exchange board, streamline and coordinate all eligibility rules and requirements among insurance affordability programs using the least restrictive rules and requirements permitted by federal and state law. This process shall include the consideration of methodologies for determining income levels, assets, rules for household size, citizenship and immigration status, work or community engagement and related exemptions, and self-attestation and verification requirements.

(k) (1) Forms and notices developed pursuant to this section shall be
 accessible and standardized, as appropriate, and shall comply with federal and state laws, regulations, and guidance prohibiting discrimination.

(2) Forms and notices developed pursuant to this section shall be developed using plain language and shall be provided in a manner that affords meaningful access to limited-English-proficient individuals, in accordance with applicable state and federal law, and at a minimum, provided in the same threshold languages as required for Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(l) The department, the California Health and Human Services Agency, and the Exchange board shall establish a process for receiving and acting on stakeholder suggestions
 and concerns regarding the Exchange, including the activities of all entities providing eligibility screening to ensure the correct eligibility rules and requirements are being used. This process shall include consumers and their advocates, be conducted no less than quarterly, and include the recording, review, and analysis of potential defects or enhancements of the eligibility systems through regular user-testing and user-centered design sessions. The process shall also include regular updates on the work to analyze, prioritize, and implement corrections to confirmed defects and proposed
 enhancements to the eligibility systems and to monitor screening and evaluation for Medi-Cal eligibility.

(m) In designing and implementing the eligibility, enrollment, and retention system, the department and the Exchange board shall ensure that all privacy and confidentiality rights under the PPACA, Public Law 119-21, and other federal and state laws are incorporated and followed, including responses to security breaches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 94.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. SERVICES FOR THE CARE OF CHILDREN [16000. - 16589.]



  CHAPTER 1. Foster Care Placement [16000. - 16014.]

16000.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve and strengthen a child’s family ties whenever possible, removing the child from the custody of his or her parents only when necessary for his or her welfare or for the safety and protection of the public. If a child is removed from the physical custody of his or her parents, preferential consideration shall be given whenever possible to the placement of the child with the relative as required by Section 7950 of the Family Code. If the child is removed from his or her own family, it is the purpose of this chapter to secure as nearly as possible for the child the custody, care, and discipline equivalent to that which should have been given to the child by his or her parents. It is further the intent of the Legislature to reaffirm its
 commitment to children who are in out-of-home placement to live in the least restrictive family setting promoting normal childhood experiences that is suited to meet the child’s or youth’s individual needs, and to live as close to the child’s family as possible pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16501.1. Family reunification services shall be provided for expeditious reunification of the child with his or her family, as required by law. If reunification is not possible or likely, a permanent alternative shall be developed.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that all children live with a committed, permanent, and nurturing family. Services and supports should be tailored to meet the needs of the individual child and family being served, with the ultimate goal of maintaining the family, or when this is not possible, transitioning the child or youth to a permanent family or preparing the child or youth for a successful transition
 into adulthood. When needed, short-term residential therapeutic program services are a short-term, specialized, and intensive intervention that is just one part of a continuum of care available for children, youth, young adults, and their families.

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature to ensure that all pupils in foster care and those who are homeless as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.) have the opportunity to meet the challenging state pupil academic achievement standards to which all pupils are held. In fulfilling their responsibilities to pupils in foster care, educators, county placing agencies, care providers, advocates, and the juvenile courts shall work together to maintain stable school placements and to ensure that each pupil is placed in the least restrictive educational programs, and has access to the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and
 enrichment activities that are available to all pupils. In all instances, educational and school placement decisions shall be based on the best interests of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 113.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The state has a duty to care for and protect the children that the state places into foster care, and as a matter of public policy, the state assumes an obligation of the highest order to ensure the safety of children in foster care.

(2) A judicial order establishing jurisdiction over a child placed into foster care supplants or limits parental or previous adult authority.

(3) Nothing in this section is intended to change the balance of liability between the state and the counties as it existed prior to the decision of the California Court of Appeal in County of Los Angeles v. Superior Court of Los Angeles: Real Party in Interest Terrell R. (2002) 102 Cal.App.4th 627, as established by the decision of the California Court of Appeal in Scott v. County of Los Angeles (1994) 27 Cal.App.4th 125. Furthermore, nothing in this section is intended to increase or decrease the liability of the state as it existed prior to the Terrell R. case.

(b) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in the decision of the California Court of Appeal in County of Los Angeles v. Superior Court of Los Angeles: Real Party in Interest Terrell R. (2002) 102 Cal.App.4th 627, shall be held to change the standards of liability and immunity for injuries to children in protective custody that existed prior to that decision.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to confirm the state’s duty to comply with all requirements under Part B of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 620 et seq.) and Part E of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) that are relevant to the protection and welfare of children in foster care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 847, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.5.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351) provides Indian tribes with the option, effective October 1, 2009, to operate a foster care, adoption assistance, and, at tribal option, a kinship guardianship assistance program under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 671 et seq.). The federal government will share the costs of a tribe operating an approved Title IV-E program.

(b) It shall be the policy of the state to maximize the opportunities for Indian tribes to operate foster care programs for Indian children pursuant to the federal Fostering Connections to Success and
 Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   (AB 770)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16000.6.

The State Department of Social Services shall negotiate in good faith with the Indian tribe, organization, or consortium in the state that requests development of an agreement with the state to administer all or part of the programs under Title IV-E of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 671 et seq.) on behalf of the Indian children who are under the authority of the tribe, organization, or consortium.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 124, Sec. 2.   (AB 770)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall provide technical assistance to encourage and facilitate the county placement agency’s evaluation of placement needs and the development of needed placement resources and programs. County placement agencies shall, on a regular basis, conduct an evaluation of the county’s placement resources and programs in relation to the needs of children and nonminor dependents placed in out-of-home care. County placement agencies shall examine the adequacy of existing placement resources and programs and identify the type of additional placement resources and programs needed. The county placement agency shall specifically examine both of the following:

(1) Placements that are out of county and shall determine the reason the
 placement was necessary, and identify the additional placement resources and programs that need to be developed and available to allow a child to remain within the county and as close as possible to their home.

(2) The county’s ability to meet the emergency housing needs of nonminor dependents in order to ensure that all nonminor dependents have access to immediate housing upon reentering foster care or for periods of transition between placements.

(b) The department shall also support the development and operation of a consortia of county placement agencies on a regional basis for the purpose of developing specialized programs serving a multicounty area.

(c) The reason for each out-of-county and out-of-state placement shall be included in the statewide child welfare information system, and the State Department of Social Services
 shall
 utilize that data to evaluate out-of-county and out-of-state placements and to assist in the identification of resource and placement needs.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social Services review the out-of-state placement of children to determine the reason for out-of-state placement. The department shall make the information available to the Legislature upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 69.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to support the urgent and exceptional needs of children and nonminor dependents in foster care under the supervision of a county child welfare agency or probation department, including those who otherwise may be placed in an out-of-state residential facility.

(b) (1) The department shall allocate funds appropriated to the department for this purpose in the Budget Act of 2021 through contracts with community-based providers or entities or through local assistance allocations to counties or Indian tribes that have entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 that support new or expanded programs, services, practices, and training that builds system capacity and ensures the
 provision of a high-quality continuum of care that is designed to support foster children in the least restrictive setting, consistent with a child’s permanency plan.

(2) Pursuant to guidance and a process established by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, Chief Probation Officers of California, and County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, fund recipients shall use the allocated funds to supplement county efforts to build system capacity for any of the following activities:

(A) Specialized models of professional foster care, including therapeutic foster care, intensive services foster care, or other models as may be developed in collaboration with counties, including the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, and providers.

(B) Intensive child-specific recruitment, family finding and engagement, and support programs for children with complex needs, including specialized permanency support services as described in Section 16501 and activities associated with the Active Supportive Intervention Services for Transition program.

(C) Specialized models of integrated care and support for family-based settings, including high-fidelity wraparound, and community-based treatment models that create alternatives to out-of-home or residential placement.

(D) Highly individualized short-term residential therapeutic programs designed to serve children with complex needs who otherwise may have been placed in an out-of-state residential facility.

(E) A Children’s Crisis Continuum Pilot Program
 established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16550).

(F) Highly specialized short-term residential therapeutic programs designed to serve children with cooccurring intellectual or developmental disabilities and behavioral health needs.

(3) Allocations made pursuant to this subdivision shall be conditioned on qualitative and outcomes standards that are established by the department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, counties, tribes, and other entities that may receive funding.

(c) (1) The department shall allocate or expend, through contracts with community-based providers or entities or through local assistance allocations to counties or Indian tribes that have entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, funds appropriated to the
 department for this purpose in the Budget Act of 2021, and in any future fiscal year, to provide and implement the recommendations of child-specific assessments, evaluations, enhanced care planning, ongoing technical assistance, and exceptional supports to meet the complex care needs of children in foster care within California within the least restrictive setting.

(2) The department shall establish a process through which funds may be made available pursuant to a request from a county child welfare agency or probation department on behalf of an individual child. Requests shall identify the exceptional services that are needed to support the child in the least restrictive setting and shall be based upon the recommendation of a qualified individual, technical assistance provided by the department, or a clinical determination of an interagency placement committee that considers the recommendations of a child and family team.

(3) Funds made available pursuant to this subdivision shall be conditioned on qualitative and outcomes standards that are established by the department. Outcomes standards shall include a continuous quality improvement process designed to address systematic gaps or barriers to meeting the needs of children and nonminor dependents in the least restrictive setting. Those outcomes standards shall be developed by the department and the State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with counties, tribes, and other entities that may receive funding.

(d) The department shall consult with the joint interagency resolution team, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the California Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, legislative staff, and other stakeholders with respect to the implementation of this
 section.

(e) Funding made available to counties pursuant to this section shall only be used to supplement, and not supplant, existing funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 44.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.5.

The State Department of Social Services shall annually distribute information declaring the importance of promoting self-esteem with respect to foster children to all of the following:

(a) Each county independent living program administrator.

(b) Each licensed foster family agency, group home, and small family home.

(c) Each county welfare department.

(d) Each county director of child protective services.

(e) Each county director of social services.

(f) Each county foster home services director.

(g) The Director of the Community Care Licensing Division of the State Department of Social Services.

(h) The Director of State Adoptions Branch of the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.7.

(a) The department shall promote the participation of current and former foster youth in the development of state foster care and child welfare policy. Subject to the availability of funds, the department shall contract with the California Youth Connection to provide technical assistance and outreach to current and former foster youth. In executing this contract, the responsibilities of the California Youth Connection shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing leadership training to current and former foster youth between the ages of 14 and 21 years.

(2) Providing outreach and technical assistance to current and former foster youth to form and maintain California Youth Connection chapters, including recruiting and training adult volunteer supporters.

(3) Enabling foster youth to be represented in policy discussions pertinent to foster care and child welfare issues.

(4) Enhancing the well-being of foster youth and increasing public understanding of foster care and child welfare issues.

(5) Developing educational materials and forums related to foster care.

(b) Funds provided to the California Youth Connection pursuant to the contract shall not be used for activities not allowed under federal law relating to the receipt of federal financial participation for independent living services, including, but not limited to, lobbying and litigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 50.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.8.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall convene a working group regarding the rights of all minors and nonminors in foster care, as specified in Section 16001.9, in order to educate foster youth, foster care providers, and others. Responsibilities of the working group shall include all of the following:

(1) By January 1, 2018, make recommendations to the Legislature for revising the rights based on a review of state law.

(2) By July 1, 2018, develop standardized information regarding the revised rights in an age-appropriate manner and reflective of any relevant licensing requirements with respect to
 the foster care providers’ responsibilities to adequately supervise children in care.

(3) By July 1, 2018, develop recommendations regarding methods for disseminating the standardized information specified in paragraph (2), including whether to require the signature of a foster child verifying that he or she has received and understands his or her rights.

(4) By July 1, 2018, develop recommendations for measuring and improving, if necessary, the degree to which foster youth are adequately informed of their rights.

 (b) The working group shall be composed of all of the following:

(1) The Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson. 

(2) The bureau at the Department of Justice whose mission is to protect the rights of children. 

(3) The County Welfare Directors Association of California.

(4) The Chief Probation Officers of California.

(5) The County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California.

(6) Current and former foster youth.

(7) Foster parents and caregivers.

(8) Foster children advocacy groups.

(9) Foster care provider associations.

(10) Any other interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 851, Sec. 1.   (AB 1067)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.9.

(a) All children placed in foster care, either voluntarily or after being adjudged a ward or dependent of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, 601, or 602, shall have the rights specified in this section. These rights also apply to nonminor dependents in foster care, except when they conflict with nonminor dependents’ retention of all their legal decisionmaking authority as an adult. The rights are as follows:

(1) To live in a safe, healthy, and comfortable home where they are treated with respect. If the child is an Indian child, to live in a home that upholds the prevailing social and cultural standards of the child’s Indian community, including, but not limited to, family, social, and political ties.
